Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.140

School district to be entirely within single educational service district.

Every school district must be included entirely within a single educational service district. If the boundaries of any school district within an educational service district are changed in any manner so as to extend the school district beyond the boundaries of that educational service district, the superintendent of public instruction shall change the boundaries of the educational service districts so affected in a manner consistent with the purposes of RCW 28A.310.010 and this section.

[ 2006 c 263 s 608; 1990 c 33 s 274; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.21.040, 28.19.515.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.